Washington statutes.
RCW 18.230.090

Uniform disciplinary act—Application to chapter.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of a registration, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons registered under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2002 c 216 s 10.]